Missouri, session 2026, SB905.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 590.1300, to read as
follows:
590.1300. 1. The POST commission shall establish a
training program to be known as the "Missouri Rangers", and
shall establish minimum standards for training instructors,
training centers, and training programs that focus on
preventing and responding to emergency or violent crisis
situations in school settings.
2. (1) Each person seeking entrance into the Missouri
rangers training program shall submit an authorization for a
criminal history background check to include the records of
the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the training center
or training program where such person is seeking entrance.
The training center or training program shall cause a
criminal history background check to be made and shall cause
the resulting report to be forwarded to the agency where the
applicant is seeking to be designated as a Missouri ranger.

SS SCS SB 905 2
(2) After a person has submitted an application, but
prior to entry to the training program, each applicant shall
take a physical fitness test:
(a) For applicants aged twenty-one to thirty-five:
a. Run one and one-half miles in less than twelve
minutes and thirty seconds;
b. Complete a minimum of four pull-ups;
c. Complete a minimum of forty pushups in less than
one minute; and
d. Complete fifty crunches in less than one minute;
(b) The POST commission shall promulgate lower age-
appropriate standards for applicants aged thirty-six to
forty-five and for applicants over the age of forty-six;
(3) No former or retired military personnel shall be
admitted to a Missouri ranger training center or training
program unless such person has received an honorable
discharge.
3. The arrest powers granted to any person who
successfully completes the Missouri ranger training program
shall be limited to:
(1) Missouri rangers who are actively employed by the
school or school district;
(2) Any property or premises owned, leased, rented, or
possessed by the school or school district, including any
school bus owned, operated, or contracted for in service on
behalf of the district while involved in school activities;
and
(3) Offenses established under chapter 571 and any
offense under section 569.140 or 569.155 involving school
property.

SS SCS SB 905 3
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any
person who is an active law enforcement officer.
4. The POST commission shall develop a training
program of not more than one hundred sixty hours that shall
include:
(1) Close quarter combat; building security and
hardening; bomb and arson; de-escalation; implicit and
racial bias; active shooter training; preventative
behavioral threat assessments; state and federal
constitutional and statutory law relating to search and
seizure, as relating to the arrests Missouri rangers are
permitted to make; firearms training; defensive tactics; an
abbreviated "stop the bleed" first aid training; and any
other related training deemed necessary by POST;
(2) The POST commission shall promulgate an
abbreviated training program for applicants that are active
or retired law enforcement officers, or active or retired
military personnel, including active or retired members of
the National Guard. As used in this section, "retired"
shall mean any law enforcement officer with ten or more
years of experience.
5. The POST commission shall promulgate rules for
continuing education training for all Missouri rangers. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,

SS SCS SB 905 4
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. The POST commission may develop a part-time
training program, provided such program satisfies all of the
requirements of this section.
7. A certificate of Missouri ranger training program
completion may be issued to any applicant by any approved
Missouri ranger training instructor. On the certificate of
program completion, the approved Missouri ranger training
instructor shall affirm that the individual receiving
instruction has taken and passed a Missouri ranger training
program that meets the requirements of this section. The
instructor shall also provide a copy of such certificate to
the director of the department of public safety.
8. Upon successful completion of the training program,
each person shall receive a certificate and a Missouri
ranger badge.
9. The front and back of the outermost garment of the
ranger uniform shall have capitalized block letters spelling
"RANGER".
10. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections
6 and 7 of section 160.665, subdivision (10) of subsection 1
100 of section 571.030, subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of
101 section 571.107, or any other provision of law to the
102 contrary, a Missouri ranger may, if authorized by the hiring
103 school or school district, carry a firearm or firearms,
104 whether loaded or unloaded, or any other weapon readily
105 capable of lethal use into the school, onto any school bus
106 owned, operated, or contracted for by the school or school
107 district, or onto any property or premises owned, leased,
108 rented, or possessed by the school or school district;

SS SCS SB 905 5
109 (2) It shall be the decision of the hiring school or
110 school district whether a ranger shall carry a firearm or
111 firearms or any other weapon readily capable of lethal use
112 as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection while on
113 duty, which type of firearm or firearms or any other weapon
114 the ranger shall carry, and whether the firearm, firearms,
115 or weapons shall be concealed;
116 (3) Each ranger shall use a level three retention
117 holster if open carrying a pistol while on duty.
118 11. For the purposes of liability and workers'
119 compensation only, Missouri rangers shall be considered
120 employees of the school or school district that hires them.
121 All other benefits for which an employee of the school or
122 school district may be eligible, such as health and
123 retirement benefits, may be offered to the ranger at the
124 discretion of the school or school district. Rangers
125 employed by a school or school district may be compensated
126 as full- or part-time employees, or on a volunteer basis
127 without compensation. Qualified immunity and the public
128 duty rule shall apply to the provisions of this section as
129 interpreted by the federal and state courts.
✓